Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20212-1246
Rules and regulations; sections; how construed.

(1) The State Racing and Gaming Commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which provide for dismissal, license revocation or suspension, fines, or other suitable penalties necessary to enforce sections 2-1243 to 2-1245.

(2) Nothing in such sections shall affect in any way the right of any horseracing industry participant to bring any action in any appropriate forum for the violation of any law of this state or any rule of racing.

Laws 1993, LB 471, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 25.